Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.72.240

Count of signatures—Review.

Any citizen dissatisfied with the determination of the secretary of state that an initiative or referendum petition contains or does not contain the requisite number of signatures of legal voters may, within five days after such determination, apply to the superior court of Thurston county for a citation requiring the secretary of state to submit the petition to said court for examination, and for a writ of mandate compelling the certification of the measure and petition, or for an injunction to prevent the certification thereof to the legislature, as the case may be. Such application and all proceedings had thereunder shall take precedence over other cases and shall be speedily heard and determined.

The decision of the superior court granting or refusing to grant the writ of mandate or injunction may be reviewed by the supreme court within five days after the decision of the superior court, and if the supreme court decides that a writ of mandate or injunction, as the case may be, should issue, it shall issue the writ directed to the secretary of state; otherwise, it shall dismiss the proceedings. The clerk of the supreme court shall forthwith notify the secretary of state of the decision of the supreme court.

[ 2003 c 111 s 1824. Prior: 1988 c 202 s 29; 1965 c 9 s 29.79.210; prior: 1913 c 138 s 17; RRS s 5413. Formerly RCW 29.79.210.]

NOTES:

Rules of court: Writ procedure superseded by RAP 2.1(b), 2.2, 18.22.

Severability—1988 c 202: See note following RCW 2.24.050.